California statutes. Water Code
Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this division, the El Dorado Irrigation District, or an improvement district formed within the El Dorado Irrigation District pursuant to the provisions of this division may:

(a) Construct, operate and maintain facilities for the collection, transmission, treatment and disposal of sewage water, including all works, structures, plants, equipment, and lines necessary and convenient for the collection, transmission, treatment, and disposal of sewage waters within the district.

(b) Construct, operate and maintain works and facilities for the use, storage, control, regulation, and distribution of any drainage water within the district.

(c) Authorize, issue and sell revenue bonds pursuant to the provisions of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) for any one or more of the purposes specified in this division.

(d) Authorize, issue and sell general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 25211.1) of Chapter 2.2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code for any one or more of the purposes specified in this division.

(e) Use the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code) for the construction of any facilities authorized to be constructed under the provisions of this division.

In the application of the above-specified acts to proceedings under this subdivision, the terms used in those acts shall have the following meanings:

(1) “City council” and “council” shall mean the board of directors of the district.

(2) “City” and “municipality” shall mean the district.

(3) “Clerk” and “city clerk” shall mean the secretary.

(4) “Superintendent of streets” and “street superintendent” and “city engineer” shall mean the general manager of the district or any other person appointed to perform such duties.

(5) “Tax collector” shall mean the district tax collector.

(6) “Treasurer” and “city treasurer” shall mean the person or officer who has charge of and makes payment of the funds of the district.

(7) “Right-of-way” shall mean any parcel of land through which a right-of-way has been granted to the district for the purpose of constructing or maintaining any work or improvements which the district is authorized to do.

The powers and duties conferred by such acts upon boards, officers and agents of cities shall be exercised by the board, officers and agents of the district, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 492.)
-------------------------------------------

22976.

This section provides for an alternative procedure for forming an improvement district within the El Dorado Irrigation District:

(a) The El Dorado Irrigation District may form one or more districts in the same manner as county service areas form zones pursuant to the County Service Area Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 25210) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code). An improvement district formed by the El Dorado Irrigation District shall have all of the powers and duties of a zone formed pursuant to the County Service Area Law.

(b) The application of, and the terms used in, those sections shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Board of supervisors” shall mean the board of directors of the district.

(2) “County service area” shall mean improvement district.

(3) “County services” shall mean El Dorado Irrigation District services.

(4) “County Service Area No. _______” shall mean “Improvement District No. _______.”

(5) “Chapter” shall mean section.

(6) “Services” shall mean “services permitted El Dorado Irrigation District.”

(7) “County taxes” shall mean El Dorado Irrigation District assessments.

(8) “County treasurer” shall mean El Dorado Irrigation District treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22977.

In the event that the board of the El Dorado Irrigation District determines that it may be for the best interests of the district for the district to have seven divisions for the purposes of Part 5 (commencing with Section 21550), it may propose, by resolution, the creation of seven divisions, the boundaries of which are set forth therein. The resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code together with a notice of a hearing to be held to consider the proposal. At the time stated in the notice for the hearing, the board shall consider the proposal and hear any owners of taxable property within the district who desire to support or oppose the proposal. If after the hearing, the board determines that it is for the best interests of the district to have the seven divisions with boundaries as proposed or as amended at the hearing, it shall, by resolution, establish the divisions and describe their boundaries. Upon the adoption of the resolution establishing seven divisions, the board shall appoint two additional directors at large who shall serve until the next general district election.

Notwithstanding the adoption of the resolution establishing the seven divisions, the five directors in office at the time of such establishment shall continue to serve until the next general district election. At such general district election, a director shall be elected in each of the seven divisions established by the board’s resolution. The directors elected at such election shall classify themselves by lot so that three shall serve for terms of two years and four shall serve for terms of four years. Thereafter, their successors shall serve for terms of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Provisions Pertaining Only to the Merced Irrigation District and the East Contra Costa Irrigation District [22980. - 22982.]

22980.

For purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Byron-Bethany Irrigation District, the Merced Irrigation District, or the East Contra Costa Irrigation District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22981.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the district, or an improvement district formed within the district pursuant to this division, may do any of the following:

(a) Construct, operate, and maintain facilities for the collection, transmission, treatment, and disposal of sewage water, including all works, structures, plants, equipment, and lines necessary and convenient for the collection, transmission, treatment, and disposal of sewage waters within the district.

(b) Construct, operate, and maintain works and facilities for the use, storage, control, regulation, and distribution of any drainage water within the district.

(c) Authorize, issue, and sell revenue bonds pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) for any purpose specified in this division.

(d) Authorize, issue, and sell general obligation bonds pursuant to Section 25216.1 of the Government Code for any purpose specified in this division.

(e) (1) Use the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code) for the construction of any facilities authorized to be constructed under this division.

(2) In the application of the acts specified in this subdivision to proceedings under this subdivision, the terms used in those acts have the following meanings:

(A) “City council” and “council” means the board of directors of the district.

(B) “City” and “municipality” means the district.

(C) “Clerk” and “city clerk” means the secretary.

(D) “Superintendent of streets” and “street superintendent” and “city engineer” means the general manager of the district or any other person appointed to perform those duties.

(E) “Tax collector” means the county assessor.

(F) “Treasurer” and “city treasurer” means the person or officer who has charge of and makes payment of the funds of the district.

(G) “Right-of-way” means any parcel of land through which a right-of-way has been granted to the district for the purpose of constructing or maintaining any work or improvements which the district is authorized to do.

(3) The powers and duties conferred by those acts upon boards, officers, and agents of cities shall be exercised by the board, officers, and agents of the district, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22982.

This section provides an alternative procedure for forming an improvement district within the district as follows:

(a) The district may form one or more improvement districts in the same manner as county service areas form zones pursuant to the County Service Area Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 25210) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code). An improvement district formed by the district shall have all of the powers and duties of a zone formed pursuant to the County Service Area Law.

(b) The application of, and the terms used in, those provisions have the following meanings:

(1) “Board of supervisors” means the board of directors of the district.

(2) “County service area” means an improvement district.

(3) “County services” means district services.

(4) “County Service Area No. ____” means “Improvement District No. ____.”

(5) “Chapter” means section.

(6) “Services” means services the district may perform.

(7) “County taxes” means district assessments.

(8) “County treasurer” means the district treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. COOPERATION [23100. - 23465.]



  CHAPTER 1. Joint Property [23100. - 23100.]

23100.

A district may make and perform any agreement with the United States, any State, county, district of any kind, public corporation, any person, or any number of them for the joint acquisition, disposition, or operation of any property of a kind which might be acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Cooperation With United States [23175. - 23302.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [23175. - 23179.]

23175.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23176.

The provisions of this chapter apply only to proceedings taken under it and do not apply to district operations unrelated to cooperation with the United States.

Except as required expressly or by necessary implication by this chapter all other provisions of this division are unaffected by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23177.

The definitions in Chapter 2 of Part 1 of this division are applicable to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23178.

Article 35 (commencing with Section 20560) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code does not apply in the case of any contract between a district and the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 682.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

23179.

The board shall perform all acts necessary to carry out the enlarged powers enumerated in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts With United States [23195. - 23204.]

23195.

Districts may cooperate and contract with the United States under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto or any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting cooperation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23196.

The co-operation and contract may be for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition, extension, or operation of works for irrigation or drainage or development and distribution of electric power or any or all of these purposes.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States on account of district land.

(d) Borrowing or procuring money from the United States to finance any of the operations of the district.

(e) Financing or refinancing obligations of the district, including outstanding warrants or other indebtedness.

(f) Purchasing or refunding bonds of the district.

(g) Accomplishing any of the purposes of the district.

(h) Maintenance and operation of works and facilities within or without its boundaries for the protection of land and property from damage by flood or overflow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

23197.

In a contract made pursuant to Section 23196 a district may include provision for either or both of the following:

(a) Delivery and distribution of water for the land in the district under the relevant acts of Congress and the rules and regulations established thereunder. 

(b) Conveyance to the United States as partial consideration for the privileges obtained by the district under the contract of any property of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23198.

When a contract has been made with the United States, if so provided by the contract and authorized pursuant to this chapter, bonds of the district may be transferred to or deposited with the United States, at not less than 95 percent of their par value, to the amount or any part thereof to be paid by the district to the United States. The interest or principal or both on the bonds shall be raised by assessment and levy as prescribed in this chapter and shall be regularly paid to the United States and applied as provided in the contract. The bonds may provide for the payment of interest at a rate not exceeding 8 percent per year, be of the denominations, and call for the repayment of the principal at the times, all as agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

23199.

The contract with the United States may likewise call for the payment of the amount or any part thereof to be paid by the district to the United States, at the times, in the installments, and with interest charges not exceeding 8 percent per year, all as may be agreed upon, and for assessment and levy as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

23200.

All water, the right to the use of which is acquired by a district under any contract with the United States shall be distributed and apportioned by the district in accordance with the applicable acts of Congress, the rules and regulations of the Secretary of the Interior thereunder, and the provisions of the contract, and provision may be made in the contract for the refusal of water service to any or all land which may become delinquent in the payment of any assessment levied for the purpose of carrying out the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23201.

A district may pursuant to the contract sell or lease water for private land, to entrymen, or to municipalities, in the neighborhood of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23202.

When a contract pursuant to this chapter has been entered into between the United States and any district, the district shall not be dissolved, nor shall its boundaries be changed, except upon written consent of the Secretary of the Interior filed with the official records of the district. If consent is given and land is excluded, the areas excluded shall be free from all liens and charges for payments to become due to the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23203.

A district may accept an appointment to collect money for or to act as fiscal agent of the United States in connection with any Federal reclamation project, and the district may assume the duties and liabilities incident to this action and do any and all things related to the appointment required by the Federal statutes now or hereafter enacted and by the applicable rules and regulations now or hereafter established by any department of the Federal Government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23204.

Any property owned or acquired by a district may be conveyed by it to the United States in so far as the property may be needed for the construction or operation of works by the United States for the benefit of the district pursuant to the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval of Federal Contracts [23220. - 23225.]

23220.

A proposal to enter into a contract with the United States shall be authorized at an election if the contract is for any or all of the following:

(a) Repayment of construction money.

(b) Repayment of the cost of acquiring any property.

(c) Issuance of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23221.

Proceedings at the election shall be had in so far as applicable in the manner provided in the case of the ordinary issuance of district bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23223.

Notice of the election shall contain in addition to the information required in the case of ordinary bond elections a statement of the maximum amount of money to be payable to the United States for construction purposes and cost of water supply and acquisition of property, exclusive of penalties and interest, and a general statement of the property, if any, to be conveyed by the district pursuant to the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23224.

The ballots at the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of election and the extent of the obligation to be assumed. To the right of or below the statement on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 46.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23225.

An action to determine the validity of any contract and bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1539.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Federal Contract Assessments [23240. - 23245.]

23240.

All payments to the United States under any contract between a district and the United States, including payments of interest and principal on bonds deposited with or transferred to the United States, shall be paid, unless otherwise provided by the contract, from revenue derived from annual assessments, apportioned pursuant to this chapter, upon real property within the district assessable for district purposes under the laws of the State, and the real property shall be and remain liable to be assessed and levied upon for the payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23241.

The district by its board shall annually levy an assessment sufficient to raise the money necessary to meet all payments when due as provided in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23242.

The assessment required in any year to meet the payment due to the United States for all purposes under the contract may be apportioned in accordance with the benefits. In the ascertainment of the benefits there shall be taken into account:

(a) The provisions of the contract, the applicable Federal laws, and the notices and regulations issued in pursuance of those laws.

(b) In addition, in case the contract is for the assumption by the district as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States theretofore existing on account of district land, the provisions of existing contracts carrying the indebtedness and the amounts of the liens that may be released in pursuance of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23242.4.

Where a district makes a contract with the United States for a supply of water or for the payment or repayment of construction costs upon a reclamation project, and the United States has theretofore made individual contracts with landowners or entrymen as to land within the district, and such landowners or entrymen have under such individual contracts paid all or a portion of the charges to be paid to the United States upon construction costs or for a water supply, the assessment required in any year to meet the payment due to the United States for all purposes under the contract may be apportioned in whole or in part in accordance with the benefits received by such landowners or entrymen under the contract between the district and the United States. In the levying of district assessments upon the lands of such landowners or entrymen, the amounts already paid by such landowners or entrymen may be taken into consideration in the levying and equalizing of the assessments to the end that such landowners or entrymen may not be required to pay by way of assessment the amounts that such landowners or entrymen may have already paid to the United States under individual contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1508.)
-------------------------------------------

23242.5.

The contract between a district and the United States may, subject to hearing and equalization as provided herein, determine, or provide for the method of computation of, the benefits accruing to each parcel of land within the district from the agreement of the district to pay the construction charges applicable to such lands to the United States; and such determination or provision in the contract may be amended from time to time.

If the district shall determine to apportion the assessment required in any year to meet the payment due to the United States on account of such construction charges in accordance with such benefits it shall establish for each parcel of land an appropriate period of years over which such benefits should be paid (which periods may be different as to different parcels), and thereby determine the amount applicable to the year in question. The annual assessment on each parcel shall be equal to the amount so determined increased by such a percentage as shall, in the opinion of the board, be deemed sufficient to cover anticipated delinquencies.

The secretary shall thereupon include an announcement of apportionment according to benefits in the notice provided for in Section 25550. At the meetings of the board as a board of equalization it may hear and determine objections to the assessment and order any changes that it deems just. Within 15 days after the close of its session as a board of equalization the board shall levy the assessment, the secretary shall transmit a record thereof to the collector, and thereafter the assessment shall be collected as in the case of other district assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1508.)
-------------------------------------------

23243.

Public land of the United States within any district shall be subject to assessment for all purposes of this chapter to the extent provided for by the act of Congress approved August 11, 1916, entitled “An act to promote reclamation of arid lands,” or any other law which may hereafter be enacted by Congress in the same relation, upon full compliance therewith by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23244.

Nothing in this chapter relieves any district from its obligation to pay as a district in case of the default of any land unless so provided by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23245.

All money collected in pursuance of the contract shall be paid into the district treasury and held in a fund to be known as the “United States Contract Fund” to be used for payments due to the United States under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Construction of Works for United States [23260. - 23264.]

23260.

When the United States is authorized to construct works for the benefit of any district and the district is obligated to repay the construction cost in whole or in part to the United States, the district may by resolution of its board enter into a contract with the United States for the construction of the works or may submit bids for the construction of the works the same as any other person may submit bids for the construction of the works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23261.

If a district is the successful bidder for the construction of the works or any part of them, the district may execute at its expense a bond for the faithful performance of the work and do any and all things required by the United States as would be required of any other successful bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23262.

A district upon the execution with the United States of a contract for the construction of works by the district shall proceed with the work in the same manner and under the same laws and rules and regulations as would apply to the district in the construction of any works which it is authorized to construct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23263.

For the purpose of providing the necessary money to carry on the construction work the district may borrow money for a term not exceeding five years at rates of interest, to be fixed by its board, not exceeding 7 per cent per year and issue notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness therefor. The aggregate amount of the indebtedness shall at no time exceed one-half of the total construction cost as provided in the construction contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23264.

Any money received by a district from the United States under the contract shall first be applied to the retirement of notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Borrowing from United States [23280. - 23289.]

23280.

In addition to other powers conferred by this chapter districts may pursuant to this article borrow or procure money from the United States for any of the following purposes:

(a) Financing any operations or purposes of the district.

(b) Financing or refinancing any or all of the obligations of the district.

(c) Refunding or purchasing bonds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23281.

When the United States has appraised the security underlying the indebtedness of any district or loans any district money to refund any of its indebtedness or to finance any of its operations, the district may in contracting for the loan agree that it will not during the life of the loan levy any assessment for an amount less than required by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23282.

Any district, upon being authorized so to do as provided by Article 3 of this chapter as modified in this article, may as evidence of the loan execute a contract with the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23283.

A district may issue bonds if required by the contract or without a contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23284.

The bonds shall contain any terms and be payable in any manner and from any source of revenue that may be agreed upon between the district and the United States and may bind the district for the payment of the bonds according to the terms thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23285.

The bonds may be serial or sinking fund bonds, may be made callable either by number or by lot, and may be made payable to bearer or to the United States. They shall be in the form and authorized and issued in the manner substantially as provided for refunding bonds of districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23287.

A majority vote at an election shall be sufficient to authorize the execution of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23288.

The notice of election and ballot need contain only the information required in the case of ordinary bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23289.

Proposals both to enter into a contract and to issue bonds may be voted upon as a single proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. County Water Districts as Irrigation Districts [23300. - 23302.]

23300.

As used in this article “county water district” means a county water district which has heretofore executed or shall hereafter execute a contract with the United States for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition, extension, or operation of works for irrigation or drainage or flood control or the development of electric or other power.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.

Every such county water district shall, within the meaning of the act of Congress approved August 11, 1916, entitled “An act to promote the reclamation of arid lands” and of the act of Congress approved May 15, 1922, entitled “An act to provide for the application of the reclamation law to irrigation districts,” be deemed to be an irrigation district organized and created under the irrigation districts laws of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23302.

Public land of the United States within any such county water district is subject to assessment and taxation for all purposes of such district to the extent provided in said acts of Congress upon full compliance therewith by the county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Cooperation With Other Districts [23375. - 23465.]



  ARTICLE 1. Cooperation With Districts in Other States [23375. - 23383.]

23375.

The provisions of this chapter do not extend the right of eminent domain to any public use in behalf of which it may not otherwise be exercised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23376.

Districts may enter into agreements with irrigation districts in adjoining States for the joint acquisition, management, and control of diverting, impounding, or distributing works for irrigating or draining land within the boundaries of the respective districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23377.

Agreements pursuant to this article may be evidenced by written contracts executed on behalf of the board of directors or trustees of each respective district or by resolutions entered upon their respective minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23378.

The contracts or certified copies of them and certified copies of the resolutions shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which is situated any of the land of the districts or any of the reservoir sites or other real property owned by the districts or acquired pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23379.

Agreements made pursuant to this article may provide for joint ownership, several ownership, or ownership in common of the property convenient for their joint purposes and may provide for the terms under which or the respective proportions in which the property shall be held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23380.

Any rights or disputes arising out of or from the agreements may be tried before and enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23381.

Any meeting of a board regularly adjourned to or called substantially in the manner for calling special meetings may be held in conjunction with the board of the cooperating district in the cooperating district in the adjoining State with the same validity as if held at the district office in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23382.

For the purposes of cooperative action pursuant to this article either district may divert water from either or both States for either or both impounding in the adjoining State or for distribution to the land of either or both cooperating districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23383.

So far as necessary for carrying out the purposes of this article a cooperating district in an adjoining State may hold title to property in this State, and a cooperating district in this State may hold title to property in the adjoining State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cooperation with County Water Districts [23450. - 23465.]

23450.

As used in this article “districts” means one or more irrigation districts together with one or more county water districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23451.

As used in this article “contract with the United States” means a contract made under the provisions of the Federal Reclamation Law for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition, extension, or operation of works for irrigation, drainage, flood control, or development of electric or other power.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23452.

As used in ths article “power rights” includes power possibilities, power resources, and power privileges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23453.

Districts may contract with each other pursuant to this article only when both:

(a) Each of the districts before or after contracting pursuant to this article makes a contract with the United States.

(b) All of the contracting districts propose to divert or carry water for use in the districts by means of a single main canal or system of works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23454.

Any contract between districts made before each of the districts has made a contract with the United States shall be effective when all of the districts have so contracted with the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23455.

In any contract between districts they may contract to compromise and settle any controversies existing between them as to the extent or priority of their respective rights and claims to the use of water and agree upon the limitation and definition of the areas within them respectively upon which such water shall be beneficially used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23456.

Districts may also contract that applications theretofore filed by either of them with the State Water Rights Board or its predecessor shall be amended to conform to the provisions of the contract between them and that permits and licenses be issued accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

23457.

Districts may also contract to compromise and settle any controversies existing between them as to power rights upon the canal or other water system, and for these purposes any of the districts may demise to another of the districts all of the power rights which the demising district has or thereafter obtains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23458.

The lease may be made for any term not exceeding 99 years and may vest in the lessee the operation, management, development, and control of the power rights and the use, sale, and control of power produced therefrom. The lease may provide for the payment of rentals and any other matters relevant to the leasing of the power rights as the districts may in their discretion deem advisable not in conflict with the Constitution of this State nor with the express terms of the statutes under which the districts are respectively organized and exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23459.

Districts may also contract that when the lease has been executed, the lessor may be required upon any terms agreed upon to procure for the lessee district contracts or applications for electric power signed by consumers in the lessor district and that the lessee district shall serve electric power in the lessor distict at rates and upon terms and conditions prescribed in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23460.

Districts may also contract that they shall cooperate to obtain permits and licenses to appropriate water for power purposes and to construct power facilities from the State Water Rights Board or any federal agency or both in the manner prescribed in the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

23461.

Districts may also contract for any other matters authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23462.
